Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1508
Burden of proof.

The petitioner shall have the burden of proving that the respondent member was not properly elected or qualified to hold office at the time of the election by clear and convincing evidence.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 15.